Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4309
Brand, defined.

Brand shall mean the term, designation, trademark, product name, or other specific designation under which individual agricultural liming material is offered for sale.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 9.